Missouri, session 2026, SB1577.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 217.550, 217.555, and 217.567, RSMo,
are repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 217.550 and 217.567, to read as follows:
217.550. 1. The department shall establish and
operate at its correctional centers a vocational enterprise
program which includes industries, services, vocational
training, and agribusiness operations. The director shall
have general supervision over planning, establishment and
management of all vocational enterprise operations provided
by and within the department and shall decide at which
correctional center each vocational enterprise shall be
located, taking into consideration the offender custody
levels, the number of offenders in each correctional center
so the best service or distribution of labor may be secured,
location and convenience of the correctional centers in
relation to the other correctional centers to be supplied or
served and the machinery presently contained in each
correctional center.
2. [No service shall be established or renewed without
prior approval by the advisory board of vocational
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1577 2
enterprises program established by section 217.555. The
board shall make a finding that the establishment of the
service shall be beneficial to those offenders involved and
shall not adversely affect any statewide economic group or
industry.
3.] The annual report of Missouri vocational
enterprises submitted to the director shall include:
(1) A list of the correctional industries, services,
vocational training programs, and agribusinesses in
operation;
(2) A list of correctional industries, services,
vocational training programs, and agribusinesses started,
terminated, moved, expanded, or reduced during the period;
(3) The average number of offenders employed in each
correctional industry, service, vocational training program,
or agribusiness operation;
(4) The volume of sales of articles, services, and
materials manufactured, grown, processed or provided;
(5) An operating statement showing the profit or loss
of each industry, service, vocational training program, and
agribusiness operation;
(6) The amount of sales to state agencies or
institutions, to political subdivisions of the state, or any
other entity with which the vocational enterprise program
does business, and the amount of open market sales, if any;
and
(7) Such other information concerning the correctional
industries, services, vocational training programs, and
agribusiness operations as requested by the director.
217.567. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any
other law to the contrary, the director is hereby authorized
to contract with a private individual, corporation,

SB 1577 3
partnership or other lawful entity for inmate work or
vocational training projects involving the manufacture and
processing of goods, wares or merchandise, or any service-
related business or commercial enterprise deemed by the
director to be consistent with the proper employment,
training and rehabilitation of offenders.
2. Any contract authorized by this section shall be in
compliance with federal law, shall be competitively
negotiated by the department and the private entity, shall
not result in the displacement of civilian workers employed
in the community or state[, and shall be subject to the
approval of the advisory board of vocational enterprises
program created pursuant to section 217.555].
3. The director may lease space in one or more
buildings or portions of buildings on the grounds of any
correctional center, together with the real estate needed
for reasonable access to and egress from the leased premises
to a private individual, corporation, partnership or other
lawful entity for the purpose of establishing and operating
a business enterprise. The enterprise shall at all times
observe practices and procedures regarding security as the
lease may specify or as the correctional center
superintendent may temporarily stipulate during periods of
emergency. The enterprise shall be deemed a private
enterprise and is subject to all federal and state laws
governing the operation of similar private business
enterprises as specified by the authorized contract.
4. Subject to the approval of the director and upon
such terms as may be prescribed, any lessee operating such
an enterprise may employ and discharge from employment
selected offenders of the correctional center where the
enterprise is operated or from other correctional centers in

SB 1577 4
close proximity. Offenders assigned to such an enterprise
are subject to all departmental and divisional rules in
addition to rules and regulations promulgated by the
authorized contractor. Offenders assigned to such an
enterprise for employment purposes shall be required to pay
a percentage of their wages as established by the director
of not less than five percent nor more than twenty percent
of gross wages to the crime victims' compensation fund,
section 595.045.
5. The director shall establish policies and
procedures for determining the specific wages paid, workers'
compensation benefits and deductions from wages to include
room and board; federal, state and Social Security taxes;
and family support. All deductions must not total more than
eighty percent of gross wages. Provisions of the Fair Labor
Standards Act shall apply to contractual offender workers.
[217.555. 1. There is hereby created and
established an "Advisory Board of Vocational
Enterprises Program" consisting of the director
of the division of offender rehabilitative
services or his designee, who shall serve as
chairman, the vocational enterprises
administrator and three members representing
organized labor and three members representing
manufacturing interests, one member who is
qualified by education and experience in
criminology, and one member who is qualified by
education and experience in vocational
rehabilitation. The public board members shall
be appointed by the department director for a
term of four years, with appointments to this
board made so that two members' terms expire
each year. The commissioner of administration
or his designee, and the governor or his
designee, shall serve as ex officio members of
the board.

SB 1577 5
2. The board shall meet at least quarterly
at the call of the chairman.
3. The board shall provide the director
advice and counsel on proper planning and
programs for the vocational enterprises program
within the department and shall make
recommendations concerning the services to be
provided and the articles manufactured,
including style, design, and quality, as well as
for economy and efficiency in their
manufacture. New industries and agribusiness
operations may be established or terminated at
the discretion of the director.
4. The members of the board, other than
the chairman, and ex officio members, shall
receive compensation at the rate of one hundred
dollars plus all actual and necessary expenses
for each day they are engaged in the discharge
of their official duties.]
✓